src/fst/morphology/affixes/propernouns.lexc
LEXICON Z1geo_oqseZ-suf !SUB
!! ** Lexicon **@LEXNAME@**  
+Sem/Geo+Prop+Abs+Sg:%>e	Krestr ; !Z1geo_oqseZ
+Sem/Geo+Prop+Rel+Sg:%>ip	Krestr ; !Z1geo_oqseZ
+Sem/Geo+Prop+Trm+Sg:%>imut	TrmVb ; !Z1geo_oqseZ
+Sem/Geo+Prop+Abl+Sg:%>imit	AblVb ; !Z1geo_oqseZ
+Sem/Geo+Prop+Abl+Sg:%>iminngaannit	Krestr ;
+Sem/Geo+Prop+Abl+Sg:%>imiit	Krestr ; !Z1geo_oqseZ
+Sem/Geo+Prop+Abl+Sg:%>iminngaanniit	Krestr ;
+Sem/Geo+Prop+Lok+Sg:%>imi	LokVb ; !Z1geo_oqseZ
+Sem/Geo+Prop+Aeq+Sg:%>itut	Krestr ; !Z1geo_oqseZ
+Sem/Geo+Prop+Ins+Sg:%>imik	Krestr ; !Z1geo_oqseZ
+Sem/Geo+Prop+Via+Sg:%>ikkut	ViaVb ; !Z1geo_oqseZ

LEXICON Z2-geoSZ  !!= * @CODE@ Ikerasaarsuk og Iqaluit
+Sem/Geo+Prop+Abs+Sg@U.Num.Sg@:@U.Num.Sg@	Krestr ; !Z2-geoSZ
+Sem/Geo+Prop+Rel+Sg@U.Num.Sg@:%>%TRUNCup@U.Num.Sg@	Krestr ; !Z2-geoSZ 
+Sem/Geo+Prop+Trm+Sg@U.Num.Sg@:%>mut@U.Num.Sg@	TrmVb ; !Z2-geoSZ
+Sem/Geo+Prop+Abl+Sg@U.Num.Sg@:%>mit@U.Num.Sg@	AblVb ; !Z2-geoSZ
+Sem/Geo+Prop+Abl+Sg@U.Num.Sg@:%>minngaannit@U.Num.Sg@	Krestr ;
+Sem/Geo+Prop+Abl+Sg@U.Num.Sg@:%>miit@U.Num.Sg@	Krestr ; !Z2-geoSZ
+Sem/Geo+Prop+Abl+Sg@U.Num.Sg@:%>minngaanniit@U.Num.Sg@	Krestr ;
+Sem/Geo+Prop+Lok+Sg@U.Num.Sg@:%>mi@U.Num.Sg@	LokVb ; !Z2-geoSZ
+Sem/Geo+Prop+Lok+Sg+Orth/Alt@U.Num.Sg@:%>-mi@U.Num.Sg@	LokVb ; !Z2-geoSZ
+Sem/Geo+Prop+Aeq+Sg@U.Num.Sg@:%>tut@U.Num.Sg@	Krestr ; !Z2-geoSZ
+Sem/Geo+Prop+Ins+Sg@U.Num.Sg@:%>mik@U.Num.Sg@	Krestr ; !Z2-geoSZ
+Sem/Geo+Prop+Via+Sg@U.Num.Sg@:%>%TRUNCkkut@U.Num.Sg@ ViaVb ; !Z2-geoSZ
+Sem/Geo+Prop+Abs+Pl@U.Num.Pl@:%>%TRUNCit@U.Num.Pl@	Krestr ; !Z2-geoSZ
+Sem/Geo+Prop+Rel+Pl@U.Num.Pl@:%>%TRUNCit@U.Num.Pl@	Krestr ; !Z2-geoSZ 
+Sem/Geo+Prop+Trm+Pl@U.Num.Pl@:%>nut@U.Num.Pl@	TrmVb ; !Z2-geoSZ
+Sem/Geo+Prop+Abl+Pl@U.Num.Pl@:%>nit@U.Num.Pl@	AblVb ; !Z2-geoSZ
+Sem/Geo+Prop+Abl+Pl@U.Num.Pl@:%>ninngaannit@U.Num.Pl@	Krestr ;
+Sem/Geo+Prop+Abl+Pl@U.Num.Pl@:%>niit@U.Num.Pl@	Krestr ; !Z2-geoSZ
+Sem/Geo+Prop+Lok+Pl@U.Num.Pl@:%>ni@U.Num.Pl@	LokVb ; !Z2-geoSZ
+Sem/Geo+Prop+Lok+Pl+Orth/Alt@U.Num.Pl@:%>-ni@U.Num.Pl@	LokVb ; !Z2-geoSZ
+Sem/Geo+Prop+Aeq+Pl@U.Num.Pl@:%>tut@U.Num.Pl@	Krestr ; !Z2-geoSZ
+Sem/Geo+Prop+Ins+Pl@U.Num.Pl@:%>nik@U.Num.Pl@	Krestr ; !Z2-geoSZ
+Sem/Geo+Prop+Via+Pl@U.Num.Pl@:%>tigut@U.Num.Pl@ ViaVb ; !Z2-geoSZ


LEXICON Z2-geoSZ_TUQAQ  !!= * @CODE@ Nuutoqaq
+Sem/Geo+Prop+Abs+Sg:	Krestr ; !Z2-geoSZ
+Sem/Geo+Prop+Rel+Sg:%>%VCTRUNCqap	Krestr ; !Z2-geoSZ 
+Sem/Geo+Prop+Trm+Sg:%>%VCTRUNCqamut	TrmVb ; !Z2-geoSZ
+Sem/Geo+Prop+Abl+Sg:%>%VCTRUNCqamit	AblVb ; !Z2-geoSZ
+Sem/Geo+Prop+Abl+Sg:%>%VCTRUNCqaminngaannit	Krestr ;
+Sem/Geo+Prop+Abl+Sg:%>%VCTRUNCqamiit	Krestr ; !Z2-geoSZ
+Sem/Geo+Prop+Abl+Sg:%>%VCTRUNCqaminngaanniit	Krestr ;
+Sem/Geo+Prop+Lok+Sg:%>%VCTRUNCqami	LokVb ; !Z2-geoSZ
+Sem/Geo+Prop+Lok+Sg+Orth/Alt:%>-mi	LokVb ; !Z2-geoSZ
+Sem/Geo+Prop+Aeq+Sg:%>%VCTRUNCqatut	Krestr ; !Z2-geoSZ
+Sem/Geo+Prop+Ins+Sg:%>%VCTRUNCqamik	Krestr ; !Z2-geoSZ
+Sem/Geo+Prop+Via+Sg:%>%VCTRUNCqakkut	ViaVb ; !Z2-geoSZ

LEXICON Z2+lgeoSZ  !!= * @CODE@ Nanortalik:Nanorta
+Sem/Geo+Prop+Abs+Sg@U.Num.Sg@:%>lik@U.Num.Sg@	Krestr ; !Z2-geoSZ
+Sem/Geo+Prop+Rel+Sg@U.Num.Sg@:%>llip@U.Num.Sg@	Krestr ; !Z2-geoSZ 
+Sem/Geo+Prop+Rel+Sg@U.Num.Sg@:%>llup@U.Num.Sg@	Krestr ; !Z2-geoSZ 
+Sem/Geo+Prop+Rel+Sg@U.Num.Sg@:%>liup@U.Num.Sg@	Krestr ; !Z2-geoSZ 
+Sem/Geo+Prop+Trm+Sg@U.Num.Sg@:%>limmut@U.Num.Sg@	TrmVb ; !Z2-geoSZ
+Sem/Geo+Prop+Abl+Sg@U.Num.Sg@:%>limmit@U.Num.Sg@	AblVb ; !Z2-geoSZ
+Sem/Geo+Prop+Abl+Sg@U.Num.Sg@:%>limminngaannit@U.Num.Sg@	Krestr ;
+Sem/Geo+Prop+Abl+Sg@U.Num.Sg@:%>limmiit@U.Num.Sg@	Krestr ; !Z2-geoSZ
+Sem/Geo+Prop+Abl+Sg@U.Num.Sg@:%>limminngaanniit@U.Num.Sg@	Krestr ;
+Sem/Geo+Prop+Lok+Sg@U.Num.Sg@:%>limmi@U.Num.Sg@	LokVb ; !Z2-geoSZ
+Sem/Geo+Prop+Lok+Sg+Orth/Alt@U.Num.Sg@:%>lik-mi@U.Num.Sg@	LokVb ; !Z2-geoSZ
+Sem/Geo+Prop+Aeq+Sg@U.Num.Sg@:%>littut@U.Num.Sg@	Krestr ; !Z2-geoSZ
+Sem/Geo+Prop+Ins+Sg@U.Num.Sg@:%>limmik@U.Num.Sg@	Krestr ; !Z2-geoSZ
+Sem/Geo+Prop+Via+Sg@U.Num.Sg@:%>likkut@U.Num.Sg@	ViaVb ; !Z2-geoSZ


LEXICON Z2-geo_uukSZ  !!= * @CODE@ Nuuk
+Sem/Geo+Prop+Abs+Sg:	Krestr ; !Z2-geoSZ
+Sem/Geo+Prop+Rel+Sg:%>%TRUNCp	Krestr ; !Z2-geoSZ 
+Sem/Geo+Prop+Trm+Sg:%>mut	TrmVb ; !Z2-geoSZ
+Sem/Geo+Prop+Abl+Sg:%>mit	AblVb ; !Z2-geoSZ
+Sem/Geo+Prop+Abl+Sg:%>minngaannit	AblVb ;
+Sem/Geo+Prop+Abl+Sg:%>miit	Krestr ; !Z2-geoSZ
+Sem/Geo+Prop+Abl+Sg:%>minngaanniit	Krestr ;
+Sem/Geo+Prop+Lok+Sg:%>mi	LokVb ; !Z2-geoSZ
+Sem/Geo+Prop+Lok+Sg+Orth/Alt:%>-mi	LokVb ; !Z2-geoSZ
+Sem/Geo+Prop+Aeq+Sg:%>tut	Krestr ; !Z2-geoSZ
+Sem/Geo+Prop+Ins+Sg:%>mik	Krestr ; !Z2-geoSZ
+Sem/Geo+Prop+Via+Sg:%>%TRUNCkkut	ViaVb ; !Z2-geoSZ

LEXICON Z2-geo_specielSZ  !!= * @CODE@ Qinngorput – Qinngorpummi, Qinngorpumi
+Sem/Geo+Prop+Abs+Sg:	Krestr ; !Z2-geoSZ
+Sem/Geo+Prop+Rel+Sg:%>%TRUNCp	Krestr ; !Z2-geoSZ 
+Sem/Geo+Prop+Trm+Sg:%>mut	TrmVb ; !Z2-geoSZ
+Sem/Geo+Prop+Trm+Sg:%>%TRUNCmut	TrmVb ; !Z2-geoSZ
+Sem/Geo+Prop+Abl+Sg:%>mit	AblVb ; !Z2-geoSZ
+Sem/Geo+Prop+Abl+Sg:%>%TRUNCmit	AblVb ; !Z2-geoSZ
+Sem/Geo+Prop+Abl+Sg:%>minngaannit	Krestr ;
+Sem/Geo+Prop+Abl+Sg:%>%TRUNCminngaannit	Krestr ;
+Sem/Geo+Prop+Abl+Sg:%>miit	Krestr ; !Z2-geoSZ
+Sem/Geo+Prop+Abl+Sg:%>%TRUNCmiit	Krestr ; !Z2-geoSZ
+Sem/Geo+Prop+Abl+Sg:%>minngaanniit	Krestr ;
+Sem/Geo+Prop+Abl+Sg:%>%TRUNCminngaanniit	Krestr ;
+Sem/Geo+Prop+Lok+Sg:%>mi	LokVb ; !Z2-geoSZ
+Sem/Geo+Prop+Lok+Sg:%>%TRUNCmi	LokVb ; !Z2-geoSZ
+Sem/Geo+Prop+Lok+Sg+Orth/Alt:%>-mi	LokVb ; !Z2-geoSZ
+Sem/Geo+Prop+Aeq+Sg:%>tut	Krestr ; !Z2-geoSZ
+Sem/Geo+Prop+Aeq+Sg:%>%TRUNCtut	Krestr ; !Z2-geoSZ
+Sem/Geo+Prop+Ins+Sg:%>mik	Krestr ; !Z2-geoSZ
+Sem/Geo+Prop+Ins+Sg:%>%TRUNCmik	Krestr ; !Z2-geoSZ
+Sem/Geo+Prop+Via+Sg:%>%TRUNCkkut	ViaVb ; !Z2-geoSZ

!Overflødig efter flag diacritics 20220427
!LEXICON Z2-geoPZ  !!= * @CODE@ Iqaluit Ny 20150129. Erstatter Z1geo_lukPZ
!+Sem/Geo+Prop+Abs+Pl:%>%TRUNCit	K_plur ; !Z1geoPZ
!+Sem/Geo+Prop+Rel+Pl:%>%TRUNCit	K_plur ; !Z1geoPZ
!+Sem/Geo+Prop+Trm+Pl:%>%TRUNCnnut	TrmVb ; !Z1geoPZ
!+Sem/Geo+Prop+Abl+Pl:%>%TRUNCnnit	AblVb ; !Z1geoPZ
!+Sem/Geo+Prop+Abl+Pl:%>%TRUNCnninngaannit	Krestr ;
!+Sem/Geo+Prop+Abl+Pl:%>%TRUNCnniit	K_plur ; !Z1geoPZ
!+Sem/Geo+Prop+Abl+Pl:%>%TRUNCnninngaanniit	K_plur ; !Z1geoPZ
!+Sem/Geo+Prop+Lok+Pl:%>%TRUNCnni	LokVb ; !Z1geoPZ
!+Sem/Geo+Prop+Aeq+Pl:%>%TRUNCttut	K_plur ; !Z1geoPZ
!+Sem/Geo+Prop+Ins+Pl:%>%TRUNCnnik	K_plur ; !Z1geoPZ
!+Sem/Geo+Prop+Via+Pl:%>%TRUNCtigut	ViaVb ; !Z1geoPZ

LEXICON Z2-geoqPZ  !!= * @CODE@ Saqqarliit
+Sem/Geo+Prop+Abs+Pl:%>%TRUNCit	K_plur ; !Z1geoPZ
+Sem/Geo+Prop+Rel+Pl:%>%TRUNCit	K_plur ; !Z1geoPZ
+Sem/Geo+Prop+Trm+Pl:%>nut	TrmVb ; !Z1geoPZ
+Sem/Geo+Prop+Abl+Pl:%>nit	AblVb ; !Z1geoPZ
+Sem/Geo+Prop+Abl+Pl:%>ninngaannit	Krestr ;
+Sem/Geo+Prop+Abl+Pl:%>niit	K_plur ; !Z1geoPZ
+Sem/Geo+Prop+Abl+Pl:%>ninngaanniit	K_plur ; !Z1geoPZ
+Sem/Geo+Prop+Lok+Pl:%>ni	LokVb ; !Z1geoPZ
+Sem/Geo+Prop+Aeq+Pl:%>tut	K_plur ; !Z1geoPZ
+Sem/Geo+Prop+Ins+Pl:%>nik	K_plur ; !Z1geoPZ
+Sem/Geo+Prop+Via+Pl:%>tigut	ViaVb ; !Z1geoPZ

LEXICON Z2-geolikPZ  !!= * @CODE@ Kapisillit:Kapisi
+Sem/Geo+Prop+Abs+Pl:lli%>t	K_plur ; !Z1geoPZ
+Sem/Geo+Prop+Rel+Pl:lli%>t	K_plur ; !Z1geoPZ
+Sem/Geo+Prop+Trm+Pl:lik%>nut	TrmVb ; !Z1geoPZ
+Sem/Geo+Prop+Abl+Pl:lik%>nit	AblVb ; !Z1geoPZ
+Sem/Geo+Prop+Abl+Pl:lik%>ninngaannit	Krestr ;
+Sem/Geo+Prop+Abl+Pl:lik%>niit	K_plur ; !Z1geoPZ
+Sem/Geo+Prop+Abl+Pl:lik%>ninngaanniit	K_plur ; !Z1geoPZ
+Sem/Geo+Prop+Lok+Pl:lik%>ni	LokVb ; !Z1geoPZ
+Sem/Geo+Prop+Aeq+Pl:lik%>tut	K_plur ; !Z1geoPZ
+Sem/Geo+Prop+Ins+Pl:lik%>nik	K_plur ; !Z1geoPZ
+Sem/Geo+Prop+Via+Pl:lik%>tigut	ViaVb ; !Z1geoPZ
