src/fst/morphology/stems/propernouns.lexc
LEXICON ateq
Nuutoqaq Z2-geoSZ_TUQAQ ;
Eqaluit@U.Num.Pl@:Eqaluk@U.Num.Pl@ Z2-geoSZ ;
Killiit:Killeq Z2-geoqPZ ;
